Washington statutes.
RCW 42.24.110

Municipal corporations and political subdivisions—Approving or paying false claim—Penalties.

Any person who knowingly approves or pays or causes to be approved or paid a false or untrue claim shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and, in addition, he or she shall be civilly liable on his or her bond to the municipal corporation or political subdivision, as the case may be, for the amount so paid or for three hundred dollars whichever is the greater.

[ 2012 c 117 s 118; 1965 c 116 s 4.]